Utah statutes.
63G-2-502.   State Records Committee -- Duties.

(1)  The records committee shall:

(a)  meet at least once every three months;

(b)  review and approve schedules for the retention and disposal of records;

(c)  hear appeals from determinations of access as provided by Section 63G-2-403; and

(d)  appoint a chairman from among its members.

(2)  The records committee may:

(a)  make rules to govern its own proceedings as provided by Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(b)  by order, after notice and hearing, reassign classification and designation for any record series by a governmental entity if the governmental entity's classification or designation is inconsistent with this chapter.

(3)  The records committee shall annually appoint an executive secretary to the records committee.  The executive secretary may not serve as a voting member of the committee.

(4)  Five members of the records committee are a quorum for the transaction of business.

(5)  The state archives shall provide staff and support services for the records committee.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(7)  If the records committee reassigns the classification or designation of a record or record series under Subsection (2)(b), any affected governmental entity or any other interested person may appeal the reclassification or redesignation to the district court.  The district court shall hear the matter de novo.

(8)  The Office of the Attorney General shall provide counsel to the records committee and shall review proposed retention schedules.

